Utah statutes.
32A-10-201 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Commission's power to grant licenses --
Limitations.
(1)  Before an establishment may sell beer at retail for on-premise
consumption, it shall first obtain:
(a)  an on-premise beer retailer license from the commission as provided in
this part; and
(b) (i)  a license issued by the local authority, as provided in Section
32A-10-101, to sell beer at retail for on-premise consumption; or
(ii)  other written consent of the local authority to sell beer at retail for
on-premise consumption.
(2) (a)  Subject to the requirements of this section and Subsection 32A-
4a-201(2), the commission may grant on-premise beer retailer licenses for the
purpose of establishing on-premise beer retailer outlets at places and in
numbers as it considers proper for the storage, sale, and consumption of beer
on premises operated as on-premise beer retailer outlets.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), the total number of on-premise beer
retailer licenses that are taverns may not at any time aggregate more than
that number determined by dividing the population of the state by 30,500.
(c)  For purposes of this Subsection (2), the population of the state shall be
determined by:
(i)  the most recent United States decennial special census; or
(ii)  another population determination made by the United States or state
governments.
(d) (i)  The commission may issue seasonal licenses for taverns established in
areas the commission considers necessary.
(ii)  A seasonal license for taverns shall be for a period of six consecutive
months.
(iii)  An on-premise beer retailer license for a tavern issued for operation
during a summer time period is known as a "Seasonal A" on-premise beer
retailer license for a tavern.  The period of operation for a "Seasonal A" on-
premise beer retailer license for a tavern shall:
(A)  begin on May 1; and
(B)  end on October 31.
(iv)  An on-premise beer retailer license for a tavern granted for operation
during a winter time period is known as a "Seasonal B" on-premise beer
retailer license for a tavern.  The period of operation for a "Seasonal B" on-
premise beer retailer license for a tavern shall:
(A)  begin on November 1; and
(B)  end on April 30.
(v)  In determining the number of tavern licenses that the commission may
grant under this section:
(A)  a seasonal on-premise beer retailer license for a tavern is counted as
one-half of one on-premise beer retailer license for a tavern; and
(B)  each "Seasonal A" on-premise beer retailer license for a tavern shall be
paired with a "Seasonal B" on-premise beer retailer license for a tavern.
(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), (c), or (d), the premises of
an on-premise beer retailer license may not be established:
(i)  within 600 feet of a community location, as measured by the method in
Subsection (3)(e); or
(ii)  within 200 feet of a community location, measured in a straight line
from the nearest entrance of the proposed outlet to the nearest property
boundary of the community location.
(b)  With respect to the establishment of an on-premise beer retailer license,
the commission may authorize a variance to reduce the proximity requirement of
Subsection (3)(a)(i) if:
(i)  the local authority grants its written consent to the variance;
(ii)  the commission finds that alternative locations for establishing an on-
premise beer retailer license in the community are limited;
(iii)  a public hearing is held in the city, town, or county, and where
practical, in the neighborhood concerned;
(iv)  after giving full consideration to all of the attending circumstances
and the policies stated in Subsections 32A-1-104(3) and (4), the commission
determines that establishing the license would not be detrimental to the
public health, peace, safety, and welfare of the community; and
(v) (A)  the community location governing authority gives its written consent
to the variance; or
(B)  when written consent is not given by the community location governing
authority, the commission finds that the applicant has established that:
(I)  there is substantial unmet public demand to consume alcohol in a public
setting within the geographic boundary of the local authority in which the on-
premise beer retailer licensee is to be located;
(II)  there is no reasonably viable alternative for satisfying substantial
unmet demand described in Subsection (3)(b)(v)(B)(I) other than through the
establishment of an on-premise beer retailer license; and
(III)  there is no reasonably viable alternative location within the
geographic boundary of the local authority in which the on-premise beer
retailer licensee is to be located for establishing an on-premise beer
retailer license to satisfy the unmet demand described in Subsection
(3)(b)(v)(B)(I).
(c)  With respect to the establishment of an on-premise beer retailer license,
the commission may authorize a variance that reduces the proximity requirement
of Subsection (3)(a)(ii) if:
(i)  the community location at issue is:
(A)  a public library; or
(B)  a public park;
(ii)  the local authority grants its written consent to the variance;
(iii)  the commission finds that alternative locations for establishing an on-
premise beer retailer license in the community are limited;
(iv)  a public hearing is held in the city, town, or county, and where
practical in the neighborhood concerned;
(v)  after giving full consideration to all of the attending circumstances and
the policies stated in Subsections 32A-1-104(3) and (4), the commission
determines that establishing the on-premise beer retailer license would not be
detrimental to the public health, peace, safety, and welfare of the community;
and
(vi) (A)  the community location governing authority gives its written consent
to the variance; or
(B)  when written consent is not given by the community location governing
authority, the commission finds that the applicant has established that:
(I)  there is substantial unmet public demand to consume alcohol in a public
setting within the geographic boundary of the local authority in which the on-
premise beer retailer licensee is to be located;
(II)  there is no reasonably viable alternative for satisfying substantial
unmet demand described in Subsection (3)(c)(vi)(B)(I) other than through the
establishment of an on-premise beer retailer license; and
(III)  there is no reasonably viable alternative location within the
geographic boundary of the local authority in which the on-premise beer
retailer licensee is to be located for establishing an on-premise beer
retailer license to satisfy the unmet demand described in Subsection
(3)(c)(vi)(B)(I).
(d) (i)  With respect to an on-premise beer retailer license granted by the
commission before July 1, 1991, to an establishment that undergoes a change in
ownership after that date, the commission may waive or vary the proximity
requirements of this Subsection (3) in considering whether to grant an on-
premise retailer beer license to the new owner.
(ii)  With respect to the premises of an on-premise beer retailer license
granted by the commission that undergoes a change of ownership, the commission
may waive or vary the proximity requirements of Subsection (3)(a) in
considering whether to grant an on-premise beer retailer license to the new
owner of the premises if:
(A) (I)  the premises previously received a variance from the proximity
requirement of Subsection (3)(a)(i); or
(II)  the premises received a variance from the proximity requirement of
Subsection (3)(a)(ii) on or before May 4, 2008; or
(B)  a variance from proximity requirements was otherwise allowed under this
title.
(e)  The 600 foot limitation described in Subsection (3)(a)(i) is measured
from the nearest entrance of the outlet by following the shortest route of
ordinary pedestrian travel to the property boundary of the community location.
(4) (a)  Nothing in this section prevents the commission from considering the
proximity of any educational, religious, and recreational facility, or any
other relevant factor in reaching a decision on a proposed location.
(b)  For purposes of this Subsection (4), "educational facility" includes:
(i)  a nursery school;
(ii)  an infant day care center; and
(iii)  a trade and technical school.
